Maryland, session 2025, HB0323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
2–214.
(a) (1) Subject to the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection, two
individuals may register a domestic partnership by filing a declaration of domestic
partnership with the register of wills in the county in which the domestic partners are
domiciled.
(2) A declaration of domestic partnership filed with the register of wills
shall:
(i) Include:
1. The full LEGAL name of each domestic partner;
2. The home address of each domestic partner; [and]
– 1 –

Ch. 226 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. The [age] DATE OF BIRTH of each domestic partner; AND
4. THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF EACH PARTY WHO
HAS A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(ii) Be signed directly by each party, or by another individual, at the
express direction of the party and in the party’s presence;
(iii) Be signed in the physical presence of a notary public or before a
notary public through communication technology in accordance with Title 18, Subtitle 2 of
the State Government Article; and
(iv) Affirm under penalty of perjury that each domestic partner is:
1. At least 18 years old;
2. The sole domestic partner of the other;
3. Not married; and
4. In a committed relationship with the other individual.
(d) (1) The register shall maintain adequate records of declarations of
domestic partnership, amendments to declarations of domestic partnership, and
termination statements.
(2) Except as provided in [paragraph (3)] PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) of
this subsection, a declaration of domestic partnership filed with a register of wills is a public
record.
(3) The register shall deny inspection of the part of a declaration of
domestic partnership that contains the home address of either domestic partner.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 4–334 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE, THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF A PARTY MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED AS
PART OF THE PUBLIC RECORD OF THE DECLARATION OF DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP.
Article – Family Law
2–402.
(a) An applicant for a license may apply to the clerk only at the office of the clerk
during regular office hours.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 226
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, to apply for a license, [1]
ONE of the parties to be married shall:
(1) appear before the clerk and give, under oath, the following information,
which shall be placed on an application form by the clerk:
(i) the full LEGAL name of each party;
(ii) the place of residence of each party;
(iii) the [age] DATE OF BIRTH of each party;
(iv) whether the parties are related by blood or marriage and, if so,
in which degree of relationship;
(v) the marital status of each party; and
(vi) whether either party was married previously, and the date and
place of each death or judicial determination that ended any former marriage;
(2) sign the application form; and
(3) provide the clerk with:
(i) the Social Security number of each party who has a Social
Security number; and
(ii) a copy of an official government–issued birth certificate or other
official government–issued document or record demonstrating the age of each party.
(c) The Social Security numbers of the parties:
(1) shall be included in the electronic file for the marriage license
application; and
(2) except as provided in § 4–334 of the General Provisions Article, may not
be disclosed as part of the public record of the marriage license application.
(d) (1) If the parties to be married are not residents of the county where the
marriage ceremony is to be performed, the clerk shall accept, instead of the application
specified in subsection (b) of this section, an affidavit from [1] ONE of the parties to be
married.
(2) The affidavit REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION shall:
– 3 –

Ch. 226 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(1)] (I) contain the information required by subsection (b) of this section;
and
[(2)] (II) be sworn to under oath before a clerk or other comparable official
in the county, state, province, or country where the party resides.
(e) Until a license becomes effective, a clerk may not disclose the fact that an
application for a license has been made except to the parent or guardian of a party to be
married.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –